Hawaii, session 2025, SB577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 205A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§205A-     Rental housing project disaster recovery permits.  (a)  Subject to terms and conditions as the department deems appropriate, a department may issue a special management area rental housing project disaster recovery permit to an applicant to re-develop a multi-family rental housing project on state or county land that was being used for a multi-family rental housing project prior to the total or partial destruction of the pre-existing project by a disaster for which the governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under chapter 127A. (b)  Except as otherwise provided in this section or under federal law, the issuance of a special management area rental housing project disaster recovery permit shall be exempt from all government statutes, charter provisions, ordinances, and rules relating to the issuance of special management area use permits. (c)  Upon issuance of a special management area rental housing project disaster recovery permit, the lead agency shall file a notice of the issuance in the next available issue of the periodic bulletin of the office of planning and sustainable development." SECTION 2.  Section 205A-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Special management area rental housing project disaster recovery permit" means an action by a department authorizing the development of a multi-family rental housing project on State or county land pursuant to section 205A-   ." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________